Hawaii, session 2026, GM1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that limited water
2 infrastructure is a major barrier to new housing and sustainable
3 land use in the State. Many properties, whether connected or
4 not to county water systems, face restrictions that prevent
5 efficient water use or new development. Rainwater catchment
6 systems offer a low-cost, sustainable way to supplement water
7 supply for potable and nonpotable uses. The legislature further
8 finds that allowing these systems across all zoning types can
9 reduce strain on public infrastructure, support local self-
10 sufficiency, and encourage responsible water management.
11 Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to:
12 (1) Require the counties to allow for the installation and
13 operation of rainwater catchment systems for potable
14 and nonpotable uses on all properties; and
15 (2) Allow the counties to require registration,
16 inspection, or notification of rainwater catchment
17 systems.
2026-3473 HB1728 GDI HMSO
liiiiininniiHiHiBiinii

Page 2
H.B. NO. -fj
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 SECTION 2. Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
2 by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
3 read as follows:
4 "§46- Regulation of rainwater catchment systems. (a)
5 Pursuant to the authority granted to the counties under section
6 46-1.5(13) and (14)(A)(ii), each county shall permit the
7 installation and operation of rainwater catchment systems for
8 potable and nonpotable uses on all properties, regardless of
9 whether the property is connected to a county water system.
10 (b) Each county may require registration, inspection, or
11 notification of rainwater catchment systems where necessary to
12 protect public health or water quality but shall not
13 unreasonably restrict or prohibit their use.
14 (c) As used in this section:
15 "County water system" means any public water infrastructure
16 operated or regulated by a department or board of water supply
17 of the county.
18 "Rainwater catchment system" means a system designed to
19 collect and store rainwater from rooftops or other surfaces for
20 potable and nonpotable use, including irrigation, toilet
21 flushing, cleaning, and landscape watering."
2026-3473 HB1728 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO. JS’i
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
2 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3473 HB1728 CDl HMSO 3
iiiiiiMiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiii

H.B. NO 1728
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1728, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1728, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
84-26